Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-807
Commission; office; location; records.

The Commission of Industrial Relations may have its office at the Capitol in the city of Lincoln or such other location as the commission may, with the approval of the Governor, determine. It shall keep a record of all of its proceedings, which shall be a public record and subject to inspection the same as other public records of this state.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 7, p. 589;

Laws 1974, LB 819, § 2.